District of Columbia statutes.
50-2401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the terms used shall have the same meaning as those defined in § 50-2421.02.

Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 2, 36 DCR 4575
Feb. 28, 1996, D.C. Law 11-95, § 4, 42 DCR 7180
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-267, § 3, 48 DCR 1248
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 13(c)(1), 50 DCR 6579
Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-24 provided that the act shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1), and publication in either the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or by November 1, 1989, whichever occurs later. D.C. Law 8-24 was effective September 9, 1989.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(c)(1) of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(c)(1) of the Removal and Disposition of Abandoned, Dangerous and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-104, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5534).
D.C. Law 15-35 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 13-267 rewrote pars. (1)(D) and (2).
1981 Ed., § 40-831.

Effect of repeal provisions: Section 14 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “Any repeal of a law or regulation by this act shall not invalidate any enforcement action, adjudication, or any other action made or taken pursuant to such law or regulation.”

Application of Law 15-35: Section 15 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “This act shall apply to all vehicles impounded after its effective date. This act shall also apply to all vehicles impounded prior to its effective date provided that notice is sent to the owners and lien holders in accordance with the provisions of subsections 7(b) or (c), as is applicable.”